Utah statutes.
26-41-105.   Authority to obtain and use an epinephrine auto-injector.

(1)  A qualified adult who is a teacher or other school employee at a public or private primary or secondary school in the state, or a school nurse, may obtain from the school district physician, the medical director of the local health department, or the local emergency medical services director a prescription for epinephrine auto-injectors.

(2)  A qualified adult may obtain from a physician, pharmacist, or any other person or entity authorized to prescribe or sell prescribed medicines or drugs, a prescription for an epinephrine auto-injector.

(3)  A qualified adult:

(a)  may immediately administer an epinephrine auto-injector to a person exhibiting potentially life-threatening symptoms of anaphylaxis when a physician is not immediately available; and

(b)  shall initiate emergency medical services or other appropriate medical follow-up in accordance with the training materials retained under Section 26-41-104 after administering an epinephrine auto-injector.

